src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----


LEXICON Nouns
raklo:rakl RAKLO "poika" ; ! o-päätteiset maskuliinit
lau:laav LAU "sana" ;
bereȟ:bereȟȟ BEREH "vuosi" ;
kaȟt:kaȟt BEREH "puu" ;
vuudarja:vuudar VUUDAR "ovi" ; ! ja ?

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
